Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.13H Extracurricular interscholastic athletic contests or competitions ââ acceptance of legal tender required. 1. For purposes of this section, âorganizationâ means the same as defined in section 280.13. 2. A public school shall accept legal tender as a form of payment for entry into any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition sponsored by an organization. As a condition of registration with the department of education under section 280.13 , an organization shall accept legal tender as a form of payment for entry into any extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition sponsored by the organization. 3. This section shall not apply to any of the following: a. An extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition that takes place at a public school or a nonpublic school that is not a member of an organization. Senate File 274, p. 2 b. An extracurricular interscholastic athletic contest or competition, sponsored by an organization, that takes place at a venue that is not owned or operated by a public school, a nonpublic school, or an organization. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 274, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor